Maryland, session 2025, SB0070.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Tax – General
10–106.
(a) (1) Each county shall set, by ordinance or resolution, a county income tax
equal to at least 2.25% but not more than [3.20%] 3.7% of an individual’s Maryland taxable
income [for a taxable year beginning after December 31, 2001].
(2) A county income tax rate continues until the county changes the rate
by ordinance or resolution.
(3) (i) A county may not increase its county income tax rate above 2.6%
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0070*

SENATE BILL 70
until after the county has held a public hearing on the proposed act, ordinance, or resolution
to increase the rate.
(ii) The county shall publish at least once each week for 2 successive
weeks in a newspaper of general circulation in the county:
1. notice of the public hearing; and
2. a fair summary of the proposed act, ordinance, or
resolution to increase the county income tax rate above 2.6%.
(4) Notwithstanding paragraph (1) or (2) of this subsection, in Howard
County, the county income tax rate may be changed only by ordinance and not by
resolution.
(b) If a county changes its county income tax rate, the county shall:
(1) increase or decrease the rate in increments of one one–hundredth of a
percentage point, effective on January 1 of the year that the county designates; and
(2) give the Comptroller notice of the rate or income bracket change and
the effective date of the rate or income bracket change on or before July 1 prior to its
effective date.
(c) (1) For any county income tax rate that is effective on or after January 1,
2022, the county may apply the county income tax on a bracket basis.
(2) A county that imposes the county income tax on a bracket basis:
(i) SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (3) OF THIS SUBSECTION, shall set,
by ordinance or resolution, the income brackets that apply to each income tax rate;
(ii) [may set income brackets that differ from the income brackets to
which the State income tax applies] MAY APPLY THE SAME INCOME TAX RATE TO MORE
THAN ONE OF THE INCOME BRACKETS REQUIRED UNDER PARAGRAPH (3) OF THIS
SUBSECTION;
(iii) may not set a minimum income tax rate less than 2.25% of an
individual’s Maryland taxable income; [and]
(iv) may not apply an income tax rate to a higher income bracket that
is less than the income tax rate applied to a lower income bracket; AND
(V) MAY NOT SET MORE THAN EIGHT INCOME BRACKETS EACH
FOR:

SENATE BILL 70 3
1. INDIVIDUALS OTHER THAN AN INDIVIDUAL
DESCRIBED UNDER ITEM 2 OF THIS ITEM; AND
2. SPOUSES FILING A JOINT RETURN OR A SURVIVING
SPOUSE OR HEAD OF HOUSEHOLD AS DEFINED IN § 2 OF THE INTERNAL REVENUE
CODE.
(3) A COUNTY THAT IMPOSES THE COUNTY INCOME TAX ON A
BRACKET BASIS SHALL SET THE INCOME BRACKET THRESHOLDS AS FOLLOWS:
(I) FOR AN INDIVIDUAL OTHER THAN AN INDIVIDUAL
DESCRIBED IN ITEM (II) OF THIS PARAGRAPH:
1. $1 THROUGH $25,000 OF MARYLAND TAXABLE
INCOME;
2. $25,001 THROUGH $50,000 OF MARYLAND TAXABLE
INCOME;
3. $50,001 THROUGH $100,000 OF MARYLAND TAXABLE
INCOME;
4. $100,001 THROUGH $250,000 OF MARYLAND
TAXABLE INCOME;
5. $250,001 THROUGH $500,000 OF MARYLAND
TAXABLE INCOME;
6. $500,001 THROUGH $750,000 OF MARYLAND
TAXABLE INCOME;
7. $750,001 THROUGH $1,000,000 OF MARYLAND
TAXABLE INCOME; AND
8. $1,000,001 OR MORE OF MARYLAND TAXABLE
INCOME; AND
(II) FOR SPOUSES FILING A JOINT RETURN OR FOR A SURVIVING
SPOUSE OR HEAD OF HOUSEHOLD AS DEFINED IN § 2 OF THE INTERNAL REVENUE
CODE:
1. $1 THROUGH $50,000 OF MARYLAND TAXABLE
INCOME;

SENATE BILL 70
2. $50,001 THROUGH $75,000 OF MARYLAND TAXABLE
INCOME;
3. $75,001 THROUGH $150,000 OF MARYLAND TAXABLE
INCOME;
4. $150,001 THROUGH $300,000 OF MARYLAND
TAXABLE INCOME;
5. $300,001 THROUGH $600,000 OF MARYLAND
TAXABLE INCOME;
6. $600,001 THROUGH $850,000 OF MARYLAND
TAXABLE INCOME;
7. $850,001 THROUGH $1,250,000 OF MARYLAND
TAXABLE INCOME; AND
8. $1,250,001 OR MORE OF MARYLAND TAXABLE
INCOME.
(4) A county may request information from the Comptroller to assist the
county in determining income brackets and applicable income tax rates that are
revenue–neutral for the county.
(D) A COUNTY MAY SET AN INCOME TAX RATE THAT IS GREATER THAN 3.2%
ONLY ON MARYLAND TAXABLE INCOME THAT IS IN EXCESS OF:
(1) $250,000 FOR INDIVIDUALS OTHER THAN AN INDIVIDUAL
DESCRIBED UNDER ITEM (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION; AND
(2) $300,000 FOR SPOUSES FILING A JOINT RETURN OR FOR A
SURVIVING SPOUSE OR HEAD OF HOUSEHOLD AS DEFINED IN § 2 OF THE INTERNAL
REVENUE CODE.
(E) IT IS THE INTENT OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY THAT A COUNTY THAT
IMPOSES AN INCOME TAX RATE THAT EXCEEDS 3.2% OF AN INDIVIDUAL’S
MARYLAND TAXABLE INCOME UTILIZE THE REVENUE ATTRIBUTABLE TO THE
COUNTY INCOME TAX RATE IN EXCESS OF 3.2% FOR THE FUNDING OF PUBLIC
EDUCATION AND TRANSPORTATION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026, and shall be applicable to all taxable years beginning after December 31, 2026.

SENATE BILL 70 5